Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,209
Claims against state; fraud in statement or proof; penalty.

Any person who corruptly practices, or attempts to practice, any fraud against the state in the proof, statement, establishment, or allowance of any claim or cause of action or any part thereof, in the matter out of which the same arose, shall ipso facto forfeit the same to the state; and it shall be the duty of the court in such case to find specifically that fraud was practiced, or attempted to be practiced, and to render judgment of forfeiture, and that the claimant be forever barred from prosecuting the same against the state, and for costs.

Laws 1877, § 9, p. 21;

R.S.1913, § 1185;

C.S.1922, § 1108;

C.S.1929, § 27-327;

R.S.1943, § 24-327;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-327.

Fraud was not practiced upon state in workmen's compensation case. Dietz v. State, 157 Neb. 324, 59 N.W.2d 587 (1953).